Utah statutes.
76-10-1505.   Discharging firearms and hurling missiles into buses and terminals -- Exception.

(1)  Any person who discharges a firearm or hurls a missile at or into any bus or terminal shall be guilty of a third degree felony.

(2)  The prohibition of this section does not apply to elected or appointed peace officers or commercial security personnel who discharge firearms or hurl missiles in the course and scope of their employment.

